Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.49.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Aircraft" means any contrivance known or hereafter invented, used, or designed for navigation of or flight in air.

(2) "Laser" means any device designed or used to amplify electromagnetic radiation by simulated [stimulated] emission which is visible to the human eye.

(3) "Laser sighting system or device" means any system or device which is integrated with or affixed to a firearm and which emits a laser light beam that is used by the shooter to assist in the sight alignment of that firearm.

[ 1999 c 180 s 2.]